Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 4 Foreclosure of Mortgages and Power of Sale
§ 34-4-113.
Payment of proceeds.

After any sale of real estate made as herein prescribed, proceeds from the sale shall be paid over by the officer or other person making the sale in the following order:

Payment of the reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the foreclosing mortgagee;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by the mortgage being foreclosed;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate or junior mortgage or other lien on the real estate sold at the foreclosure sale; and

Surplus proceeds on demand to the mortgagor, his legal representatives or assigns, and if no demand is made, then the foreclosing mortgagee, officer or other person making sale may retain the surplus proceeds for disposition to the mortgagor or may dispose of the surplus proceeds in accordance with W.S.

34-24-101

et seq.

If the foreclosing mortgagee receives a demand for the proceeds accompanied by the materials required by W.S. 1-18-104(c) and signed by the holder of a subordinate or junior mortgage or other lien within thirty (30) days after the results of the sale are served in accordance with W.S.

34-4-104

, proceeds remaining after distribution under paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) of this section shall be paid over by the officer or other person making the sale as agreed upon by all parties in interest, or by court order, to the subordinate mortgagees or lienholders in accordance with their priority and to the extent of their interest.

Subject to the other provisions of this section, a mortgagee shall account to and pay a mortgagor for any surplus, and the mortgagor is liable for any deficiency.

History.

Laws 1882, ch. 72,§ 11; R.S. 1887, § 46; R.S. 1899, § 2789; C.S. 1910, § 3681; C.S. 1920, § 4639; R.S. 1931, § 71-215; C.S. 1945, § 59-212; W.S. 1957, § 34-79; Laws 2005, ch. 228, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, and applicable to real estate mortgage foreclosures and execution sales commenced on or after July 1, 2005, rewrote this section, which formerly read: “If after any sale of real estate made as herein prescribed, there shall remain in the hands of the officer or other person making the sale any surplus money after satisfying the mortgage on which such real estate was sold and payment of the costs and expenses of such foreclosure and sale, the surplus shall be paid over by such officer or other person on demand to the mortgagor, his legal representatives or assigns.”

Deficiency judgment.—

District court did not err in ruling that a lender was entitled to a deficiency judgment because consent and confirmation orders did not alter a limited liability company (LLC) member’s obligations under a Wyoming judgment the lender obtained against the member and LLC for the outstanding balance of a loan; the member was not a party to the LLC’s bankruptcy case, and thus, he was not entitled to the benefits the LLC obtained through the bankruptcy process. Thomas v. JLC Wyo., LLC, 2019 WY 14, 434 P.3d 104,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2019).

Applied

in

National Tailoring Co. v. Scott, 65 Wyo. 64, 196 P.2d 387,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(1948).

“Lien theory” mortgage foreclosure scheme. —

In this foreclosure action, the grant of summary judgment to the bank was affirmed; the full amount of the finance company's bid must be applied to the secured debt because under Wyoming law, and by the finance company's own admission, the effect of a successful credit bid was to satisfy and discharge a mortgage. Republic Bank of Chi. v. 1st Republic Bank of Chi. v. 1st Advantage Bank, 2013 IL App (1st) 120885, 376 Ill. Dec. 366, 999 N.E.2d 9, 2013 Ill. App. LEXIS 630 (Ill. App. Ct. 1st Dist. 2013).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Superfund — Your Friendly Hometown Lender? The Liability of Financial Institutions under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 493 (1989).